Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1205
Maximum single risk; statement; filing required.

There shall be filed with the Department of Insurance, by such attorney, a statement under oath of such attorney showing the maximum amount of indemnity upon any single risk, and such attorney shall, whenever and as often as the same shall be required, file with the department a statement verified by his oath, giving such information.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 5, p. 460;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 5, p. 683;

C.S.1922, § 7973;

C.S.1929, § 44-1505;

R.S.1943, § 44-1205.